Illinois, session 104th, HB2685.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Findings. The General Assembly finds that: 5        (1) Licensed school librarians help students acquire 6    unique skills not taught in the classroom and information 7    and technology skills that are essential for students. 8        (2) Academic research provides significant evidence 9    indicating the value added to students' academic 10    development by the presence of a strong school library 11    program led by a licensed school librarian. 12        (3) The presence of full-time licensed school 13    librarians and appropriate support staff who implement a 14    quality, school-integrated library services program is 15    directly related to student educational gains. 16        (4) Quality school library programs staffed by 17    licensed school librarians help close the achievement gap 18    of students who come from economically disadvantaged 19    backgrounds. 20        (5) Curtailment of school library instructional 21    programs has had a negative impact on students' 22    achievement in kindergarten through grade 12 learning 23    environments and the ability of youth to appropriately and 24    fully utilize the resources of public and academic   HB2685 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 11346 AAS 21434 b1    libraries. 2        (6) There is an interdependence among types of 3    libraries within a community. School libraries are at the 4    center of this ecosystem, and school libraries provide the 5    beginning of a lifelong connection to academic and public 6    libraries throughout Illinois.7        (7) Government has the responsibility to ensure that 8    every child in the State of Illinois receives a strong 9    foundation in literacy. 10    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 112-3.206 as follows: 12    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.206 new)13    Sec. 2-3.206. Licensed School Librarian Task Force.14    (a) As used in this Section, "licensed school librarian" 15means an individual who holds a Professional Educator License 16with a library information specialist endorsement through the 17State Board. 18    (b) The State Board shall establish and convene the 19Licensed School Librarian Task Force within 120 days after the 20effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 21Assembly.22    (c) The Task Force shall include the following members:23        (1) Two members appointed by the State Board.24        (2) One member from a statewide organization   HB2685 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 11346 AAS 21434 b1    representing licensed school librarians appointed by the 2    Secretary of State.3        (3) One member from a statewide educational group 4    whose members include licensed school librarians appointed 5    by the Secretary of State.6        (4) One member from each of the Illinois regional 7    library systems appointed by the Secretary of State.8        (5) One member from an Illinois university that offers 9    a library information specialist endorsement program 10    appointed by the Governor.11        (6) One member appointed by the President of the 12    Senate.13        (7) One member appointed by the Speaker of the House 14    of Representatives.15        (8) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 16    Senate.17        (9) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 18    House of Representatives.19    The Chairperson of the State Board, or his or her 20designee, shall be a nonvoting member of the Task Force and 21shall serve as Chairperson of the Task Force. Members of the 22Task Force shall serve for the entirety of the Task Force 23without compensation. If a vacancy occurs in Task Force's 24membership, it shall be filled in the same manner as the 25original appointment for the entirety of the Task Force. A 26quorum of Task Force members is not required for the Task Force   HB2685 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 11346 AAS 21434 b1to convene or meet.2    (d) The State Board shall provide administrative and 3technical support to the Task Force.4    (e) The Task Force shall meet a minimum of 4 times and 5shall submit, no later than 12 months after the first 6convening of the Task Force, a final report to the Governor and 7the General Assembly containing recommendations, including, 8but not limited to, recommendations for how to ensure Illinois 9public elementary and secondary schools consider, budget 10appropriate resources for, and employ licensed school 11librarians in future academic years from available State and 12local resources. The Task Force shall also make 13recommendations on appropriate library resources when licensed 14school librarians are unable to staff or be employed in school 15libraries that serve students in public elementary and 16secondary schools. The Task Force is dissolved upon submission 17of its report.18    (f) This Section is repealed on July 1, 2027.  19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.